District of Columbia statutes.
44-607

Declaratory judgment.

A for-profit entity or healthcare entity that has participated in the review process may bring an action for declaratory judgment against the decision of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia and may appeal the decision to the Superior Court according to the standards set forth in § 2-510.

History

Oct. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-32, § 8, 44 DCR 4819
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 66, 52 DCR 2638

Cross References

Hospital and medical services corporation regulation, exclusivity of provisions, see § 31-3502.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3502.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-557.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.